Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1709
Corner markers; loss or destruction; report to county board; liability for failure to report.

Any person having knowledge of the loss or destruction of a corner marker of a land survey, who shall fail or neglect to report the same in writing as provided in section 39-1708 shall be liable for the expense of the resurvey and restoration of such corner, and for any damage sustained by landowners by reason of such failure or neglect.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 9, p. 544.